Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.36
State-owned or leased sites or structures; naming.

Except when sites or structures are named by statute, the administrator, after considering any recommendations of the Nebraska Capitol Commission, shall review the proposals of the various agencies and commissions for the naming of state-owned or leased sites or structures. Unless otherwise provided by statute, sites or structures shall not be named for citizens who are active elected officials or active employees of the State of Nebraska. Subsequent to review, the proposed name shall be approved by the Governor and the Legislature.

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 27;

Laws 1978, LB 955, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 351, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 311, § 5.